Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.028

Opinions as to validity or constitutionality.

Neither the reviser nor any member of his or her staff shall be required to furnish any written opinion as to the validity or constitutionality of any proposed legislation, which he or she may be requested to draft or prepare, nor shall any member of the committee be required to pass upon the constitutionality of any matter submitted to it for consideration.

[ 2011 c 336 s 4; 1955 c 235 s 4.]